District of Columbia statutes.
50-2513

Tax exemption.

(a)

Bonds issued by the Authority and the interest thereon are exempt from District taxation except estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.

(b)

Real and personal property owned and used for exempt purposes by the Authority shall be exempt from District taxation.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 14, 41 DCR 4652
1981 Ed., § 40-853.